Maine, session 132, LD2030.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §18375, sub-§1, ¶Q, as amended by PL 2023, c. 354, §8, is
further amended to read:
Q. Prescribe, dispense or administer fluoride, silver diamine fluoride, antimicrobial
solutions for mouth rinsing, topical anesthetics, other nonsystemic antimicrobial
agents, desensitizing agents and resorbable antimicrobial agents; and
Sec. 2. 32 MRSA §18375, sub-§1, ¶R, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 354, §8, is
amended to read:
R. Perform dental hygiene assessment, dental hygiene diagnosis and dental hygiene
treatment planning and implementation in the identification, prevention and
management of oral disease.; and
Page 1 - 132LR2700(03)

Sec. 3. 32 MRSA §18375, sub-§1, ¶S is enacted to read:
S. Administer local anesthesia or nitrous oxide analgesia, as long as the independent
practice dental hygienist has authority to administer the relevant medication pursuant
to section 18345, subsection 2, paragraph D or E, respectively.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR2700(03)